Hawaii statutes.
§200D-5 Annual report. The council
shall submit an annual report on its activities to the governor and the
legislature, which may include recommendations; provided that the
recommendations are consistent with the purposes of this chapter. [L
1993, c 317, pt of §2, §7; am L 1998, c 4, §3; am L 2009, c 68, §1; am L 2010,
c 19, §§3, 4]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next